Washington statutes.
RCW 10.55.110

Uniformity of interpretation.

This chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of the states which enact it.

[ 1943 c 218 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 2150-5.]